Utah statutes.
61-2g-312.   State-certified appraisers -- Authority.

(1)  A state-certified residential appraiser is authorized to appraise the types of real estate which a state-licensed appraiser is authorized to appraise.

(2)  A state-certified residential appraiser is also authorized to appraise 1-4 unit residential real estate without regard to transaction value or complexity.

(3)  A state-certified residential appraiser is not authorized to appraise subdivisions for which a development analysis/appraisal is necessary.

(4)  A state-certified general appraiser is authorized to appraise all types of real estate and real property.

